dictionaries/ru-ru.aff
SET KOI8-R

SFX Z Y 4
SFX Z   ÙÊ   Ï            [ÌÎÒÔ×]ÙÊ
SFX Z   ÉÊ   Ï            ØËÉÊ
SFX Z   ÉÊ   É            [ÃÓ]ËÉÊ
SFX Z   ÉÊ   Å            ÝÉÊ
